Utah statutes.
78B-1-138.   Witnesses -- Exempt from arrest in civil action.

Every person who has been in good faith served with a subpoena to attend as a witness before a court, judge, commissioner, referee or other person, in a case where the disobedience of the witness may be punished as a contempt, is exempt from arrest in a civil action while going to the place of attendance, necessarily remaining there and returning therefrom.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

